test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-vaipunu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vaipunu - ok : # Adjective 'tired' - 
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Nom: vaipunu
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Gen: vaipunheen
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Par: vaipunutta
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Tra: vaipunheeksi
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Abe: vaipunheetta
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Ine: vaipunheessa
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Ela: vaipunheesta
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Ill: vaipunheesseen
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Ade: vaipunheela
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Abl: vaipunheelta
     vaipunu+N+Sg+All: vaipunheele
     vaipunu+N+Sg+Ess: vaipunheena
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Nom: vaipunheet
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Gen: vaipunheitten
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Par: vaipunheita
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Tra: vaipunheiksi
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Abe: vaipunheitta
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Ine: vaipunheissa
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Ela: vaipunheista
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Ill: vaipunheissiin
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Ade: vaipunheila
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Abl: vaipunheilta
     vaipunu+N+Pl+All: vaipunheile
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Ess: vaipunheina
     vaipunu+N+Pl+Com: vaipunheine
